Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-172
Salvage branded certificate of title; required disclosure.

A certificate of title issued on or after January 1, 2003, shall disclose in writing, from any records readily accessible to the department or county officials or a law enforcement officer, anything which indicates that the vehicle was previously issued a title in another jurisdiction that bore any word or symbol signifying that the vehicle was branded, including, but not limited to, older model salvage, unrebuildable, parts only, scrap, junk, nonrepairable, reconstructed, rebuilt, flood damaged, damaged, buyback, or any other indication, symbol, or word of like kind, and the name of the jurisdiction issuing the previous title.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 72;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 13.